src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
! ============================= !
!! # Noun morphological lexica 
! ============================= !

! ===== !
! Nouns 
! ===== !

LEXICON Vocative   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Voc: # ;

LEXICON Noun1_IS_PTC_OM !!≈ * **@CODE@** is to provide deverbal nouns with +Der/wm tags
!+V+Der+Der/wm: NMN_ ; 2026-07-01
 NMN_ ;

LEXICON Noun1_IS_PTC_AN !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+V+Der+Der/An: NMN_ ;

LEXICON Noun1_IS_PTC_YSJ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
!+V+Der+Der/ysj: NMN_ ; 2026-07-01
NMN_ ;

LEXICON N_DOR ! мӧдладор The Russian is an adverbial phrase
!+Der+Der/dor: NMN_ ; 2026-06-30
 NMN_ ;

LEXICON N_LA
+Der/La: NMN_ ;

LEXICON N_VYV ! тулысвыв The Russian is an adverbial phrase
!+Der+Der/vyv: NMN_ ; 2026-06-30
 NMN_ ;

LEXICON N_rus100 ! Homographs
+Src/F: NMN_ ;
!LEXICON N_ruskpv ! Komi-like Russian words
!+Src/F: NMN_ ;

LEXICON N_rus100_hasnat ! Homographs
+Src/F: NMN_ ;
LEXICON N_ruskpv_hasnat ! Komi-like Russian words
+Src/F: NMN_ ;


LEXICON N_ruskpv_R_RY_hasnat !
+Use/NG+Err/Orth: NMN_ ;  ! This deals with январь

LEXICON Noun1_SYT_STY !
+Use/NG+Err/Orth:ть NMN_ ;  ! This deals with гӧсть
:ьт         NMN_ ; ! This is the new proper spelling гӧсьт


!2018-10-21!LEXICON N_KINDRED_
!2018-10-21! N_ ;
!2018-10-21!+PxSg1+Assoc+Pl:%>ӧяс CASEPOSSLEX ;
!2018-10-21!+PxSg2+Assoc+Pl:%>ыдъяс CASEPOSSLEX ;
!2018-10-21!+PxSg3+Assoc+Pl:%>ысъяс CASEPOSSLEX ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON N_PROFESSION_
!2018-10-21! N_ ;
!2018-10-21!@C.CONJ_INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@+Der+Der/al:@C.CONJ_INF@@C.CONJ-POSS@%>{ая}л V_ШУНЫ ; !! таксисталӧ 
!! Basic nouns.

!! The lexicon for basic nouns is ` N_ `



LEXICON N_errorth
+Err/Orth: N_ ;
LEXICON N_RELAT_
+Relat: NMN_ ;
LEXICON N_
+Der+Dimin+N:%>тор N_PARAGOGIC_J ;
: NMN_ ;

LEXICON Noun1 !! This should be phased out 2013-05-07
 N_ ;
LEXICON N_RU_ӦЙ
+Use/SpellNoSugg:  N_ ;

LEXICON NMN_
 R ;
! ABS_ ; 2018-10-21
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX ;
+Pl:%>ъяс CASEPOSSLEX ;


!LEXICON Noun1_JM ! понйыс, понмыс
!+Use/NG:м CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;
!!2017-09-19+Cmp:м R ;
!!2017-09-19+Sg:м CASEPOSSLEX ;
!!2017-09-19+Cmp:й R ;
!:й NMN_PARAGOGIC ;
!!2017-09-19+Sg:й CASEPOSSLEX ;
!!2017-09-19+Pl:%>ъяс CASEPOSSLEX ;

!! subsequent Cns vs Vow
LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC !!= * @CODE@ 
: NMN_PARAGOGIC ;
LEXICON NMN_PARAGOGIC !!= * @CODE@ 
+Cmp:^Close R ;
!:^Close ABS_ ; 2018-10-21
+Sg:^Close CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;
+Sg:^Close DERIVEDADJ_IN_CONS ;
+Sg: DERIVEDADJ_IN_VOW ;

+Pl:^Close%>ъяс CASEPOSSLEX ;

!Izhma style
+Sg+Err/Dial:^C2V CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+Sg+Err/Dial:^C2V DERIVEDADJ_IN_CONS ;
+Pl+Err/Dial:^C2V%>ъяс CASEPOSSLEX ;


LEXICON N_RELAT_PARAGOGIC_V/L !!= * @CODE@ ныв:ны нылыс
+Relat: NMN_PARAGOGIC_V/L ;

LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC_V/L !!= * @CODE@ ныв:ны нылыс
: NMN_PARAGOGIC_V/L ;
LEXICON NMN_PARAGOGIC_V/L !!= * @CODE@ ныв:ны нылыс
:^л2 NMN_PARAGOGIC ;

+Use/NG+Err/Orth-l-retenstion+Cmp:^л2 R ;
!+Err/Orth+Dial/l+Cmp:^л2 ABS_ ; 2018-10-21
+Use/NG+Err/Orth-l-retenstion+Sg:^л2 CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth-l-in-v+Sg:^л2^Close CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth-l-retenstion+Pl:^л2%>ъяс CASEPOSSLEX ;
+Use/NG+Err/Orth-l-to-vowel-lengthening+Pl:^л2^C2V%>ъяс CASEPOSSLEX ; !ныыяс


LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC_J !!= * @CODE@ ав:ав авйыс
: NMN_PARAGOGIC_J ;
LEXICON NMN_PARAGOGIC_J !!= * @CODE@ ав:ав^й2 авйыс
:^й2 NMN_PARAGOGIC ;
+Use/NG+Sg+Err/Orth-no-paragogic-j:^й2^Close CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;
+Use/NG+Sg+Err/Orth-no-paragogic-j:^й2^Close DERIVEDADJ_IN_VOW ;

LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC_K !!= * @CODE@ пос:пос^к2 поскыс
: NMN_PARAGOGIC_K ;
LEXICON NMN_PARAGOGIC_K !!= * @CODE@ пос:пос^к2 поскыс
:^к2 NMN_PARAGOGIC ;
+Use/NG+Sg+Err/Orth-no-paragogic-k:^к2^Close CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;
+Use/NG+Sg+Err/Orth-no-paragogic-k:^к2^Close DERIVEDADJ_IN_VOW ;

LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC_M !!= * @CODE@ зон:зон зонмыс
: NMN_PARAGOGIC_M ;
LEXICON NMN_PARAGOGIC_M !!= * @CODE@ зон:зон зонмыс
:^м2 N_PARAGOGIC ;
+Use/NG+Sg+Err/Orth-no-paragogic-m:^м2^Close CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;
+Use/NG+Sg+Err/Orth-no-paragogic-m:^м2^Close DERIVEDADJ_IN_VOW ;

LEXICON N_PARAGOGIC_T !!= * @CODE@ зеп:зеп зептыс
: NMN_PARAGOGIC_T ;
LEXICON NMN_PARAGOGIC_T !!= * @CODE@ зеп:зеп зептыс
:^т2 N_PARAGOGIC ;
+Use/NG+Sg+Err/Orth-no-paragogic-t:^т2^Close CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;
+Use/NG+Sg+Err/Orth-no-paragogic-t:^т2^Close DERIVEDADJ_IN_VOW ;

LEXICON N_END_IN_DD1 !!= * @CODE@ гадь:гад гаддьыс
: NMN_END_IN_DD1 ;
LEXICON NMN_END_IN_DD1 !!= * @CODE@ автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс
:дь NMN_PARAGOGIC ;

LEXICON N_END_IN_DDZ !!= * @CODE@ кыдз:кыд
: NMN_END_IN_DDZ ;
LEXICON NMN_END_IN_DDZ !!= * @CODE@ кыдз:кыд
:дз NMN_PARAGOGIC ;

LEXICON N_END_IN_LL1 !!= * @CODE@ моль:мол молльӧ
: NMN_END_IN_LL1 ;
LEXICON NMN_END_IN_LL1 !!= * @CODE@ моль:мол молльӧ
:ль NMN_PARAGOGIC ;



LEXICON N_RELAT_END_IN_J !!= * @CODE@ абай:аба абайыс
+Relat: N_0_END_IN_J ;
LEXICON N_END_IN_J !!= * @CODE@ абай:аба абайыс
: N_0_END_IN_J ;
LEXICON N_0_END_IN_J !!= * @CODE@ абай:аба абайыс
+Cmp:й R ;
!:й ABS_ ; 2018-10-21
+Sg:й CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_Я ;
+Sg:й CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_Ӧ ;
+Pl:й%>яс CASEPOSSLEX ;


LEXICON N_RELAT_END_IN_Ч/ДЗ !!= * @CODE@ водз:водз
+Relat: NMN_END_IN_Ч/ДЗ ;
LEXICON N_END_IN_Ч/ДЗ !!= * @CODE@ водз:водз
: NMN_END_IN_Ч/ДЗ ;
LEXICON NMN_END_IN_Ч/ДЗ !!= * @CODE@ водз:водз
+Cmp: R ;
!: ABS_ ; 2018-10-21
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;
+Pl:%>ьяс CASEPOSSLEX ;

LEXICON N_RELAT_END_IN_Ь !!= * @CODE@ автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс
+Relat:  N_0_END_IN_Ь ;
LEXICON N_END_IN_Ь !!= * @CODE@ автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс
:  N_0_END_IN_Ь ;
LEXICON N_0_END_IN_Ь !!= * @CODE@ автомобиль:автомобил автомобильыс
+Cmp:ь R ;
!:ь ABS_ ; 2018-10-21
+Sg:ь CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_Я ;
+Sg:ь CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_Ӧ ;
+Pl:%>ьяс CASEPOSSLEX ; !! 2015-09-04 change to ь%>яс after xfst rules are removed
+Sg:ь DERIVEDADJ ;
+Pl:%>ьяс DERIVEDADJ ;

!2018-10-21!LEXICON NounLA ! ӧтила
!2018-10-21!N_ ; ! Difference betw N_ and NounLA still to be documented.

!LEXICON NounMort
! медводзаысь гӧгӧрвои, мый ӧтика лыдын морт, уна лыдын йӧз
! http://komicorpora.ru/index.php#poisk мортъяс => 503
! Сідзи кӧ позяс бырӧдны NounMort LEXICON_сӧ
!N_ ; ! Difference betw N_ and NounMort still to be documented.
! Бырӧдім 2019-06-14

!LEXICON NounSG ! м орт
!+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX ;

LEXICON NounPi ! пи These have a unique  pl marker ян.
+Sg: CASEPOSSLEX ;
+Pl:%>ян CASEPOSSLEX ;


LEXICON NounPL_plc ! бедьторъяс
+Sem/Plc: NounPL ;
LEXICON NounPL ! бедьторъяс
+Pl: CASEPOSSLEX ; ! here, %>ъяс is put as part of the stem
! Very many plural nouns do not have this tag. We could change яс-final
! nouns from N_ to NounPL, I guess.

!2018-10-21!LEXICON NounPOSS ! чой niece, nephew
!2018-10-21!N_ ; ! Declension to be determined.

LEXICON FIRST
+Cmp: # ;


! =================== !
!! ## Inflectional lexica
! =================== !


!! All nouns follow one contlex "N_"
!! to begin with here is simply a list of all variant
!! with no more variants beyond:

! Numbers
! Case + Poss or Poss+Case


LEXICON CASEPOSSLEX !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 DERIVEDADJ ;    ! Deriving prenominal adjectives, республикаса
CASEPOSSLEX_afterDerivation ;

LEXICON CASEPOSSLEX_afterDerivation
 CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END ;
  CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_VOW ;

LEXICON CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END
+Nom+PxSg1:%>ӧ WordEnd ;!2026-06-10
 NOM/MORPH_THEN_WORDEND ;
!2020-10-23 remove ZERO +Acc: K ; !ZERO marker
+Gen+MWN:%>лӧн CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END_MINUS_ZERO_END ; !Ellipsis OKK:2000:94
	CASEPOSSLEX_AFTERDERIVATION_CNS/END_MINUS_ZERO_END ;
