src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
адама+N:адама FIRST  "" ;
бедь+N:бед N_END_IN_DD1  "sauva" ;
бок+N+Err/Dial:бӧк N_RELAT_ ;
больӧдчысь+N:больӧдчысь Noun1_IS_PTC_YSJ "lörpöttelijä" ;
вакуль+N:вакул N_END_IN_LL1  "vetehinen" ;
варышъяс+N:варышъяс NounPL  "" ;
вевдор+N:вевдор N_RELAT_  "yläosa" ;
веськыдвыв+N:веськыдвы N_PARAGOGIC_V/L  "oikea puoli" ;
видз+Hom2+N:вид N_END_IN_DDZ  "niitty" ;
вильді+N:вильді N_  "" ;
виргадь+N:виргад N_END_IN_DD1  "verirakkula" ;
водз+N:водз N_RELAT_END_IN_Ч/ДЗ  "etupuoli" ;
выв+N:вы N_RELAT_PARAGOGIC_V/L  "pinta" ;
вылысладор+N:вылысладор N_DOR  "" ;
выльторъяс+N:выльторъяс NounPL  "uutiset" ;
вӧвлытӧмтор+N:вӧвлытӧмтор N_PARAGOGIC_J  "" ;
вӧдитчысь+N:вӧдитчыс N_END_IN_Ь  "käyttäjä" ;
галдарей+N:галдаре N_END_IN_J  "" ;
гектарув+N:гектару N_PARAGOGIC_V/L  "" ;
грабитысь+N:грабитысь Noun1_IS_PTC_YSJ  "" ;
гуджгысьяс+N:гуджгысьяс NounPL  "jyrsijät" ;
гут-лӧдз+N:гут-лӧд N_END_IN_DDZ  "" ;
гӧстинеч+N:гӧстинеч N_END_IN_Ч/ДЗ  "lahja" ;
гӧсьт+N:гӧс Noun1_SYT_STY  "" ;
дадь+N:дад N_END_IN_DD1  "kelkka" ;
дзоль+N:дзол N_END_IN_LL1  "pieni puikko (pilppua, kirppaa varten)" ;
дор+N:дор N_RELAT_  "reuna" ;
ен+N:ен N_PARAGOGIC_M  "jumala" ;
жельнӧг+N:жельнӧг N_  "villiruusu" ;
жыдачпи+N:жыдачпи NounPi  "" ;
зырымбедь+N:зырымбед N_END_IN_DD1  "räkänokka" ;
идз+N:ид N_END_IN_DDZ  "varsi" ;
йитчӧмтор+N:йитчӧмтор N_PARAGOGIC_J  "" ;
йыв+N:йы N_RELAT_PARAGOGIC_V/L  "kärki" ;
йӧн+N:йӧн N_PARAGOGIC_M  "karhiainen" ;
йӧртандор+N:йӧртандор N_DOR  "" ;
казначей+N:казначе N_END_IN_J  "" ;
катыд+N:катыд N_RELAT_  "" ;
кекӧнь+N:кекӧн N_END_IN_Ь  "" ;
кес+N:кес N_PARAGOGIC_K  "hohtimet" ;
кеслач+N:кеслач N_END_IN_Ч/ДЗ  "palvelija" ;
киль+N:кил N_END_IN_LL1  "suomut" ;
киняув+N:киняу N_PARAGOGIC_V/L  "kainalo" ;
кляп+N:кляп N_PARAGOGIC_T  "" ;
контрреволюция+N:контрреволюция N_  "vastavallankumous" ;
корадодь+N:корадод N_END_IN_DD1  "" ;
корвыв+N:корвыл N_VYV  "" ;
крысапи+N:крысапи NounPi  "" ;
лоп+N:лоп N_PARAGOGIC_T  "perna" ;
лыдпасъяс+N:лыдпасъяс NounPL  "tilastot" ;
лыс+N:лыс N_PARAGOGIC_K  "neulanen" ;
лэбач+N:лэбач N_END_IN_Ч/ДЗ  "lintu" ;
лёдз+N:лёд N_END_IN_DDZ  "valli" ;
лёквыв+N:лёквыл N_VYV  "" ;
лёкладор+N:лёкладор N_DOR  "" ;
лӧмӧсь+N:лӧмӧс N_END_IN_Ь  "" ;
лӧсьыдтор+N:лӧсьыдтор N_PARAGOGIC_J  "hyvä asia" ;
марксист+N:марксист N_  "marxilainen" ;
мастерӧвӧй+N:мастерӧвӧ N_END_IN_J  "" ;
межпи+N:межпи NounPi  "pässikaritsa" ;
мусин+N:мусин N_PARAGOGIC_M  "multa" ;
мыль+N:мыл N_END_IN_LL1  "kasvain" ;
мышкавыв+N:мышкавы N_PARAGOGIC_V/L  "" ;
некивыв+N:кекивыл N_VYV  "" ;
нитш+N:нитш N_PARAGOGIC_K  "sammal" ;
орд+N:орд N_RELAT_  "" ;
пель+N:пел N_RELAT_END_IN_Ь  "korva" ;
пельвыв+N:пельвыл N_VYV  "" ;
пельтуг+N:пельтуг N_PARAGOGIC_J  "korvannipukka" ;
петандор+N:петандор N_DOR  "" ;
пом+N:пом N_RELAT_  "pää" ;
помеч+N:помеч N_END_IN_Ч/ДЗ  "talkoot" ;
пон+v2+N:пон N_PARAGOGIC_M  "koira" ;
портфель+N:портфел N_END_IN_Ь  "" ;
посув+N:посу N_PARAGOGIC_V/L  "" ;
пыш+N:пыш N_PARAGOGIC_K  "hamppu" ;
пышкайпи+N:пышкайпи NounPi  "" ;
рӧсов+N:рӧсо N_PARAGOGIC_V/L  "suolavesi" ;
сабля+N:сабля N_  "heinäsuova" ;
сай+N:са N_RELAT_END_IN_J  "" ;
сборнӧй+N:сборнӧ N_END_IN_J  "" ;
содз+N:сод N_END_IN_DDZ  "kahmalo" ;
средствояс+N:средствояс NounPL  "keinot" ;
сьылΙтшуп+N:сьылΙтшуп N_PARAGOGIC_T  "säkä" ;
толич+N:толич N_END_IN_Ч/ДЗ  "" ;
тулыславыв+N:тулыславыл N_VYV  "" ;
тус+N:тус N_PARAGOGIC_K  "" ;
тусьтор+N:тусьтор N_PARAGOGIC_J  "" ;
тшуп+N:тшуп N_PARAGOGIC_T  "" ;
тӧвладор+N:тӧвладор N_DOR  "" ;
ув+N:у N_RELAT_PARAGOGIC_V/L  "alusta" ;
ун+N:ун N_PARAGOGIC_M  "täti" ;
усьпаньвыв+N:усьпаньвыл N_VYV  "" ;
чеп+N:чеп N_PARAGOGIC_T  "ketju" ;
чибӧпи+N:чибӧпи NounPi  "" ;
чиль+N:чил N_END_IN_LL1  "" ;
ызӧн+N:ызӧн N_  "" ;
ягладор+N:ягладор N_DOR  "" ;
яй+N:я N_END_IN_J  "liha" ;
ёрдъялысь+N:ёрдъялыс N_END_IN_Ь  "tuomari" ;
ӧтитор+N:ӧтитор N_PARAGOGIC_J  "yksi (asia)" ;
ӧшка-мӧска+N:ӧшка-мӧска N_errorth  "" ;
предложение+N:предложение N_rus100  "" ;
тайм+N:тайм N_rus100  "" ;
терминология+N:терминология Noun1  "" ;
художество+N:художество Noun1  "taide" ;
аттестация+N:аттестация N_rus100 ;
марксизм-ленинизм+N:марксизм-ленинизм N_rus100 ;
вокализм+N:вокализм N_rus100 ;
обществовед+N:обществовед N_rus100 ;
цвет+N:цвет N_rus100_hasnat ;
январ+v1+N:январ N_ruskpv_hasnat ;
январ+v2+N:январь N_ruskpv_R_RY_hasnat ;
декабр+v1+N:декабр N_ruskpv_hasnat ;
декабр+v2+N:декабрь N_ruskpv_R_RY_hasnat ;
